California statutes. Corporations Code
(b) A general partner’s duty of loyalty to the limited partnership and the other partners is limited to the following:

(1) to account to the limited partnership and hold as trustee for it any property, profit, or benefit derived by the general partner in the conduct and winding up of the limited partnership’s activities or derived from a use by the general partner of limited partnership property, including the appropriation of a limited partnership opportunity;

(2) to refrain from dealing with the limited partnership in the conduct or winding up of the limited partnership’s activities as or on behalf of a party having an interest adverse to the limited partnership; and

(3) to refrain from competing with the limited partnership in the conduct or winding up of the limited partnership’s activities.

(c) A general partner’s duty of care to the limited partnership and the other partners in the conduct and winding up of the limited partnership’s activities is limited to refraining from engaging in grossly negligent or reckless conduct, intentional misconduct, or a knowing violation of law.

(d) A general partner shall discharge the duties to the partnership and the other partners under this chapter or under the partnership agreement and exercise any rights consistently with the obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

(e) A general partner does not violate a duty or obligation under this chapter or under the partnership agreement merely because the general partner’s conduct furthers the general partner’s own interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15904.09.

(a) A partnership agreement may provide for the creation of classes of general partners. The partnership agreement shall define the rights, powers, and duties of those classes including rights, powers, and duties senior to other classes of general partners.

(b) The partnership agreement may provide to all or certain specified classes of general partners the right to vote separately or with all or any class of the general partners on any matters.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Contributions and Distributions [15905.01. - 15905.09.]

15905.01.

A contribution of a partner may consist of tangible or intangible property or other benefit to the limited partnership, including money, services performed, promissory notes, other agreements to contribute cash or property, and contracts for services to be performed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15905.02.

(a) A partner’s obligation to contribute money or other property or other benefit to, or to perform services for, a limited partnership is not excused by the partner’s death, disability, or other inability to perform personally.

(b) If a partner does not make a promised nonmonetary contribution, the partner is obligated at the option of the limited partnership to contribute money equal to the value of that portion, as stated in the required information, of the stated contribution which has not been made.

(c) The obligation of a partner to make a contribution or return money or other property paid or distributed in violation of this chapter may be compromised
 only by consent of all partners. A creditor of a limited partnership which extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on an obligation described in subdivision (a), without notice of any compromise under this subdivision, may enforce the original obligation.

(d) A partnership agreement may provide that the interest of a partner who fails to make any contribution or other payment that the partner is required to make will be subject to specific remedies for, or specific consequences of, the failure. A provision shall be enforceable in accordance with its terms unless the partner seeking to invalidate the provision establishes that the provision was unreasonable under the circumstances existing at the time the agreement was made. The specific remedies or consequences may include loss of voting, approval, or other rights, loss of the partner’s ability to actively participate in the management and operations of the partnership, liquidated damages,
 or a reduction of the defaulting partner’s economic rights. The reduction of the defaulting partner’s economic rights may include one or more of the following provisions:

(1) Diluting, reducing or eliminating the defaulting partner’s proportionate interest in the partnership.

(2) Subordinating the defaulting partner’s interest in the partnership to that of nondefaulting partners.

(3) Permitting a forced sale of the partnership interest.

(4) Permitting the lending or contribution by other partners of the amount necessary to meet the defaulting partner’s commitment.

(5) Adjusting the interest rates or other rates of return, preferred, priority, or otherwise, with respect to contributions by
 or capital accounts of the other partners.

(6) Fixing the value of the defaulting partner’s interest in the partnership by appraisal, formula and redemption, or sale of the defaulting partner’s interest in the partnership at a percentage of that value.

(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the rights of third-party creditors of the partnership to seek equitable remedies nor any rights existing under the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3439) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Civil Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 21.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

15905.03.

A distribution by a limited partnership must be shared among the partners on the basis of the value, as stated in the required records when the limited partnership decides to make the distribution, of the contributions the limited partnership has received from each partner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15905.035.

The profits and losses of a limited partnership shall be allocated among the partners in the manner provided in the partnership agreement. If the partnership agreement does not otherwise provide, profits and losses shall be allocated in the same manner as the partners share distributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15905.04.

A partner does not have a right to any distribution before the dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership unless the limited partnership decides to make an interim distribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15905.05.

A person does not have a right to receive a distribution on account of dissociation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15905.06.

A partner does not have a right to demand or receive any distribution from a limited partnership in any form other than cash. Subject to subdivision (b) of Section 15908.09, a limited partnership may distribute an asset in kind to the extent each partner receives a percentage of the asset equal to the partner’s share of distributions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

15905.07.

When a partner or transferee becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the partner or transferee has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited partnership with respect to the distribution. However, the limited partnership’s obligation to make a distribution is subject to offset for any amount owed to the limited partnership by the partner or dissociated partner on whose account the distribution is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15905.08.

(a) A limited partnership may not make a distribution in violation of the partnership agreement.

(b) A limited partnership may not make a distribution if after the distribution:

(1) the limited partnership would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the ordinary course of the limited partnership’s activities; or

(2) the limited partnership’s total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities plus the amount that would be needed, if the limited partnership were to be dissolved, wound up, and terminated at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights upon dissolution, winding up, and termination of partners whose preferential rights are superior to those of persons receiving the distribution.

(c) A limited partnership may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subdivision (b) on financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances or on a fair valuation or other method that is reasonable in the circumstances.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), the effect of a distribution under subdivision (b) is measured:

(1) in the case of distribution by purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of a transferable interest in the limited partnership, as of the date money or other property is transferred or debt incurred by the limited partnership; and

(2) in all other cases, as of the date:

(A) the distribution is authorized, if the payment occurs within 120 days after that date; or

(B) the payment is made, if payment occurs more than l20 days after the distribution is authorized.

(e) A limited partnership’s indebtedness to a partner incurred by reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section is at parity with the limited partnership’s indebtedness to its general unsecured creditors.

(f) A limited partnership’s indebtedness, including indebtedness issued in connection with or as part of a distribution, is not considered a liability for purposes of subdivision (b) if the terms of the indebtedness provide that payment of principal and interest are made only to the extent that a distribution could then be made to partners under this section.

(g) If indebtedness is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest on the indebtedness is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15905.09.

(a) A general partner that consents to a distribution made in violation of Section 15905.08 is personally liable to the limited partnership for the amount of the distribution which exceeds the amount that could have been distributed without the violation if it is established that in consenting to the distribution the general partner failed to comply with Section 15904.08.

(b) A partner or transferee that received a distribution knowing that the distribution to that partner or transferee was made in violation of Section 15905.08 is personally liable to the limited partnership but only to the extent that the distribution received by the partner or transferee exceeded the amount that could have been properly paid under Section 15905.08.

(c) A general partner against which an action is commenced under subdivision (a) may:

(1) implead in the action any other person that is liable under subdivision (a) and compel contribution from the person; and

(2) implead in the action any person that received a distribution in violation of subdivision (b) and compel contribution from the person in the amount the person received in violation of subdivision (b).

(d) An action under this section is barred if it is not commenced within four years after the distribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Dissociation [15906.01. - 15906.07.]

15906.01.

(a) A person does not have a right to dissociate as a limited partner before the termination of the limited partnership.

(b) A person is dissociated from a limited partnership as a limited partner upon the occurrence of any of the following events:

(1) the limited partnership’s having notice of the person’s express will to withdraw as a limited partner or on a later date specified by the person;

(2) an event agreed to in the partnership agreement as causing the person’s dissociation as a limited partner;

(3) the person’s expulsion as a limited partner pursuant to the partnership agreement;

(4) the person’s expulsion as a limited partner by the unanimous consent of the other partners if:

(A) it is unlawful to carry on the limited partnership’s activities with the person as a limited partner;

(B) there has been a transfer of all of the person’s transferable interest in the limited partnership, other than a transfer for security purposes, or a court order charging the person’s interest, which has not been foreclosed;

(C) the person is a corporation and, within 90 days after the limited partnership notifies the person that it will be expelled as a limited partner because it has filed a certificate of dissolution or the equivalent, its charter has been revoked, or its right to conduct business has been suspended by the jurisdiction of its incorporation, there is no revocation of the certificate of dissolution or no reinstatement of its charter or its right to conduct business; or

(D) the person is a limited liability company or partnership that has been dissolved and whose business is being wound up;

(5) on application by the limited partnership, the person’s expulsion as a limited partner by judicial order because:

(A) the person engaged in wrongful conduct that adversely and materially affected the limited partnership’s activities;

(B) the person willfully or persistently committed a material breach of the partnership agreement or of the obligation of good faith and fair dealing under subdivision (b) of Section 15903.05; or

(C) the person engaged in conduct relating to the limited partnership’s activities which makes it not reasonably practicable to carry on the activities with the person as limited partner;

(6) in the case of a person who is an individual, the person’s death;

(7) in the case of a person that is a trust or is acting as a limited partner by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, distribution of the trust’s entire transferable interest in the limited partnership, but not merely by reason of the substitution of a successor trustee;

(8) in the case of a person that is an estate or is acting as a limited partner by virtue of being a personal representative of an estate, distribution of the estate’s entire transferable interest in the limited partnership, but not merely by reason of the substitution of a successor personal representative;

(9) termination of a limited partner that is not an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust, or estate;

(10) the limited partnership’s participation in a conversion or merger under Article 11 (commencing with Section 15911.01), if the limited partnership:

(A) is not the converted or surviving entity; or

(B) is the converted or surviving entity but, as a result of the conversion or merger, the person ceases to be a limited partner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15906.02.

(a) Upon a person’s dissociation as a limited partner:

(1) subject to Section 15907.04, the person does not have further rights as a limited partner;

(2) the person’s obligation of good faith and fair dealing as a limited partner under subdivision (b) of Section 15903.05 continues only as to matters arising and events occurring before the dissociation; and

(3) subject to Section 15907.04 and Article 11 (commencing with Section 15911.01), any transferable interest owned by the person in the person’s capacity as a limited partner immediately before dissociation is owned by the person as a mere transferee.

(b) A person’s dissociation as a limited partner does not of itself discharge the person from any obligation to the limited partnership or the other partners which the person incurred while a limited partner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15906.03.

A person is dissociated from a limited partnership as a general partner upon the occurrence of any of the following events:

(a) the limited partnership’s having notice of the person’s express will to withdraw as a general partner or on a later date specified by the person;

(b) an event agreed to in the partnership agreement as causing the persons dissociation as a general partner;

(c) the person’s expulsion as a general partner pursuant to the partnership agreement;

(d) the person’s expulsion as a general partner by the unanimous consent of the other partners if:

(1) it is unlawful to carry on the limited partnership’s activities with the person as a general partner;

(2) there has been a transfer of all or substantially all of the person’s transferable interest in the limited partnership, other than a transfer for security purposes, or a court order charging the person’s interest, which has not been foreclosed;

(3) the person is a corporation and, within 90 days after the limited partnership notifies the person that it will be expelled as a general partner because it has filed a certificate of dissolution or the equivalent, its charter has been revoked, or its right to conduct business has been suspended by the jurisdiction of its incorporation, there is no revocation of the certificate of dissolution or no reinstatement of its charter or its right to conduct business; or

(4) the person is a limited liability company or partnership that has been dissolved and whose business is being wound up;

(e) on application by the limited partnership, the person’s expulsion as a general partner by judicial order because:

(1) the person engaged in wrongful conduct that adversely and materially affected the limited partnership activities;

(2) the person willfully or persistently committed a material breach of the partnership agreement or of a duty owed to the partnership or the other partners under Section 15904.08; or

(3) the person engaged in conduct relating to the limited partnership’s activities which makes it not reasonably practicable to carry on the activities of the limited partnership with the person as a general partner;

(f) the person’s:

(1) becoming a debtor in bankruptcy;

(2) execution of an assignment for the benefit of creditors;

(3) seeking, consenting to, or acquiescing in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the person or of all or substantially all of the person’s property; or

(4) failure, within 90 days after the appointment, to have vacated or stayed the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the general partner or of all or substantially all of the person’s property obtained without the person’s consent or acquiescence, or failing within 90 days after the expiration of a stay to have the appointment vacated;

(g) in the case of a person who is an individual:

(1) the person’s death;

(2) the appointment of a guardian or general conservator for the person; or

(3) a judicial determination that the person has otherwise become incapable of performing the person’s duties as a general partner under the partnership agreement;

(h) in the case of a person that is a trust or is acting as a general partner by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, distribution of the trust’s entire transferable interest in the limited partnership, but not merely by reason of the substitution of a successor trustee;

(i) in the case of a person that is an estate or is acting as a general partner by virtue of being a personal representative of an estate, distribution of the estate’s entire transferable interest in the limited partnership, but not merely by reason of the substitution of a successor personal representative;

(j) termination of a general partner that is not an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust, or estate; or

(k) the limited partnership’s participation in a conversion or merger under Article 11 (commencing with Section 15911.01), if the limited partnership:

(1) is not the converted or surviving entity; or

(2) is the converted or surviving entity but, as a result of the conversion or merger, the person ceases to be a general partner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15906.04.

(a) A person has the power to dissociate as a general partner at any time, rightfully or wrongfully, by express will pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 15906.03.

(b) A person’s dissociation as a general partner is wrongful only if:

(1) it is in breach of an express provision of the partnership agreement; or

(2) it occurs before the termination of the limited partnership, and:

(A) the person withdraws as a general partner by express will;

(B) the person is expelled as a general partner by judicial determination under subdivision (e) of Section 15906.03;

(C) the person is dissociated as a general partner by becoming a debtor in bankruptcy; or

(D) in the case of a person that is not an individual, trust other than a business trust, or estate, the person is expelled or otherwise dissociated as a general partner because it willfully dissolved or terminated.

(c) A person that wrongfully dissociates as a general partner is liable to the limited partnership and, subject to Section 15910.01, to the other partners for damages caused by the dissociation. The liability is in addition to any other obligation of the general partner to the limited partnership or to the other partners.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15906.05.

(a) Upon a person’s dissociation as a general partner all of the following apply:

(1) The person’s right to participate as a general partner in the management and conduct of the partnership’s activities terminates.

(2) The person’s duty of loyalty as a general partner under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 15904.08 terminates.

(3) The person’s duty of loyalty as a general partner under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 15904.08 and duty of care under subdivision (c) of Section 15904.08 continue only with regard to matters
 arising and events occurring before the person’s dissociation as a general partner.

(4) The person may sign and deliver to the Secretary of State on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State for filing, containing the name of the limited partnership and the Secretary of State’s file number of the limited partnership, a certificate of dissociation pertaining to the person and, at the request of the limited partnership, shall sign an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership which states that the person has dissociated.

(5) Subject to Section 15907.04 and Article 11 (commencing with Section 15911.01), any transferable interest owned by the person immediately before dissociation in the person’s capacity as a general partner is owned by the person as a mere transferee.

(b) A person’s dissociation as a general
 partner does not of itself discharge the person from any obligation to the limited partnership or the other partners which the person incurred while a general partner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 27.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

15906.06.

(a) After a person is dissociated as a general partner and before the limited partnership is dissolved, converted under Article 11 (commencing with Section 15911.01), or merged out of existence under that article, the limited partnership is bound by an act of the person only if:

(1) the act would have bound the limited partnership under Section 15904.02 before the dissociation; and

(2) at the time the other party enters into the transaction:

(A) less than two years have passed since the dissociation; and

(B) the other party does not have notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a general partner.

(b) If a limited partnership is bound under subdivision (a), the person dissociated as a general partner which caused the limited partnership to be bound is liable:

(1) to the limited partnership for any damage caused to the limited partnership arising from the obligation incurred under subdivision (a); and

(2) if a general partner or another person dissociated as a general partner is liable for the obligation, to the general partner or other person for any damage caused to the general partner or other person arising from the liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15906.07.

(a) A person’s dissociation as a general partner does not of itself discharge the person’s liability as a general partner for an obligation of the limited partnership incurred before dissociation. Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the person is not liable for a limited partnership’s obligation incurred after dissociation.

(b) A person whose dissociation as a general partner resulted in a dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership’s activities is liable to the same extent as a general partner under Section 15904.04 on an obligation incurred by the limited partnership under Section 15908.04.

(c) A person that has dissociated as a general partner but whose dissociation did not result in a dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership’s activities is liable on a transaction entered into by the limited partnership after the dissociation only if:

(1) a general partner would be liable on the transaction; and

(2) at the time the other party enters into the transaction:

(A) less than two years have passed since the dissociation; and

(B) the other party does not have notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a general partner.

(d) By agreement with a creditor of a limited partnership and the limited partnership, a person dissociated as a general partner may be released from liability to the creditor for an obligation of the limited partnership.

(e) A person dissociated as a general partner is released from liability for an obligation of the limited partnership if the limited partnership’s creditor, with notice of the person’s dissociation as a general partner but without the person’s consent, agrees to a material alteration in the nature or time of payment of the obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Transferable Interests and Rights of Transferees and Creditors [15907.01. - 15907.04.]

15907.01.

The only interest of a partner which is transferable is the partner’s transferable interest. A transferable interest is personal property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15907.02.

(a) A transfer, in whole or in part, of a partner’s transferable interest:

(1) is permissible;

(2) does not by itself cause the partner’s dissociation or a dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership’s activities; and

(3) does not, as against the other partners or the limited partnership, entitle the transferee to participate in the management or conduct of the limited partnership’s activities, to require access to information concerning the limited partnership’s transactions except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), or to inspect or copy the required information or the limited partnership’s other records or to exercise any other rights or powers of a partner.

(b) A transferee has a right to receive, in accordance with the transfer, distributions to which the transferor would otherwise be entitled.

(c) A transferee is entitled to an account of the limited partnership’s transactions only upon the dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership.

(d) Upon transfer, the transferor retains the rights of a partner other than the interest in distributions transferred and retains all duties and obligations of a partner.

(e) A limited partnership need not give effect to a transferee’s rights under this section until the limited partnership has notice of the transfer.

(f) A transfer of a partner’s transferable interest in the limited partnership in violation of a restriction on transfer contained in the partnership agreement is ineffective as to a person having notice of the restriction at the time of transfer.

(g) A transferee that becomes a partner with respect to a transferable interest is liable for the transferor’s obligations under Sections 15905.02 and 15905.09. However, the transferee is not obligated for liabilities unknown to the transferee at the time the transferee became a partner.

(h) A transferee of a partnership interest, including a transferee of a general partner, may become a limited partner if and to the extent that (1) the partnership agreement provides or (2) all general partners and a majority in interest of the limited partners consent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15907.03.

(a) On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a partner or transferee, the court may charge the transferable interest of the judgment debtor with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest. To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of a transferee. The court may appoint a receiver of the share of the distributions due or to become due to the judgment debtor in respect of the limited partnership and make all other orders, directions, accounts, and inquiries the judgment debtor might have made or which the circumstances of the case may require to give effect to the charging order.

(b) A charging order constitutes a lien on the judgment debtor’s transferable interest. The court may order a foreclosure upon the interest subject to the charging order at any time. The purchaser at the foreclosure sale has the rights of a transferee.

(c) At any time before foreclosure, an interest charged may be redeemed:

(1) by the judgment debtor;

(2) with property other than limited partnership property, by one or more of the other partners; or

(3) with limited partnership property, by the limited partnership with the consent of all partners whose interests are not so charged.

(d) This chapter does not deprive any partner or transferee of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to the partner’s or transferee’s transferable interest.

(e) This section provides the exclusive remedy by which a judgment creditor of a partner or transferee may satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor’s transferable interest.

(f) No creditor of a partner shall have any right to obtain possession or otherwise exercise legal or equitable remedies with respect to the property of the limited partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15907.04.

If a partner dies, the deceased partner’s personal representative or other legal representative may exercise the rights of a transferee as provided in Section 15907.02 and, for the purposes of settling the estate, may exercise the rights of a current limited partner under Section 15903.04.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Dissolution [15908.01. - 15908.09.]

15908.01.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 15908.02, a limited partnership is dissolved, and its activities must be wound up, only upon the occurrence of any of the following:

(a) the happening of an event specified in the partnership agreement;

(b) the consent of all general partners and of limited partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at the time the consent is to be effective;

(c) after the dissociation of a person as a general partner:

(1) if the limited partnership has at least one remaining general partner, and a consent to dissolve the limited partnership is given within 90 days after the dissociation by partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as partners at the time the consent is to be effective; or

(2) if the limited partnership does not have a remaining general partner, the passage of 90 days after the dissociation, unless before the end of the period:

(A) consent to continue the activities of the limited partnership and admit at least one general partner is given by limited partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at the time the consent is to be effective; and

(B) at least one person is admitted as a general partner in accordance with the consent; or

(d) the passage of 90 days after the dissociation of the limited partnership’s last limited partner, unless before the end of the period the limited partnership admits at least one limited partner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative January 1, 2008, pursuant to Section 15912.04.)
-------------------------------------------

15908.02.

(a) On application by a partner, a court of competent jurisdiction may order dissolution of a limited partnership if it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the activities of the limited partnership in conformity with the partnership agreement.

(b) In any suit for judicial dissolution, the other partners may avoid the dissolution of the limited partnership by purchasing for cash the partnership interests owned by the partners so initiating the proceeding (the “moving parties”) at their fair market value. In fixing the value, the amount of any damages resulting if the initiation of the dissolution is a breach by any moving party or parties of
 an agreement with the purchasing party or parties, including, without limitation, the partnership agreement, may be deducted from the amount payable to the moving party or parties.

(c) If the purchasing parties (1) elect to purchase the partnership interests owned by the moving parties, (2) are unable to agree with the moving parties upon the fair market value of the partnership interests, and (3) give bond with sufficient security to pay the estimated reasonable expenses, including attorneys’ fees, of the moving parties if the expenses are recoverable under subdivision (d), the court, upon application of the purchasing parties, either in the pending action or in a proceeding initiated in the superior court of the proper county by the purchasing parties, shall stay the winding up and dissolution proceeding and shall proceed to ascertain and
 fix the fair market value of the partnership interests owned by the moving parties.

(d) The court shall appoint three disinterested appraisers to appraise the fair market value of the partnership interests owned by the moving parties, and shall make an order referring the matter to the appraisers so appointed for the purpose of ascertaining that value. The order shall prescribe the time and manner of producing evidence, if evidence is required. The award of the appraisers or a majority of them, when confirmed by the court, shall be final and conclusive upon all parties. The court shall enter a decree that shall provide in the alternative for winding up and dissolution of the limited partnership unless payment is made for the partnership interests within the time specified by the decree. If the purchasing parties do not make payment for the
 partnership interests within the time specified, judgment shall be entered against them and the surety or sureties on the bond for the amount of the expenses, including attorneys’ fees, of the moving parties. Any member aggrieved by the action of the court may appeal therefrom.

(e) If the purchasing parties desire to prevent the winding up and dissolution of the limited partnership, they shall pay to the moving parties the value of their partnership interests ascertained and decreed within the time specified pursuant to this section, or, in the case of an appeal, as fixed on appeal. On receiving that payment or the tender thereof, the moving parties shall transfer their partnership interests to the purchasing parties.

(f) For the purposes of this section, the valuation date shall be
 the date upon which the action for judicial dissolution was commenced. However, the court may, upon the hearing of a motion by any party, and for good cause shown, designate some other date as the valuation date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 93.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15908.03.

(a) A limited partnership continues after dissolution only for the purpose of winding up its activities.

(b) In winding up its activities, the limited partnership:

(1) may amend its certificate of limited partnership to state that the limited partnership is dissolved, preserve the limited partnership business or property as a going concern for a reasonable time, prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or administrative, transfer the limited partnership’s property, settle disputes by mediation or arbitration, file a certificate of cancellation as provided in Section 15902.03, and perform other necessary acts; and

(2) shall discharge the limited partnership’s liabilities, settle and close the limited partnership’s activities, and marshal and distribute the assets of the partnership.
